Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-5602
Excise tax; amount; payment.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, an excise tax of one cent per pound is levied upon all grapes sold through commercial channels in Nebraska or delivered in Nebraska. The excise tax shall be paid by the grower at the time of sale or delivery and shall be collected by the first purchaser. Grapes shall not be subject to the excise tax imposed by this section more than once.

(2) The excise tax imposed by this section shall not apply to the sale of grapes to the federal government for the ultimate use or consumption by the people of the United States when the State of Nebraska is prohibited from imposing such excise tax by the United States Constitution and the laws enacted pursuant thereto.

Laws 2007, LB441, § 3.